South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S653.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 140 In-Home Drug Disposal Section 44-140-10. The term "in-home drug disposal system" means a site of use system of drug disposal that changes the physical integrity of the formulation of a drug and renders the active ingredients of such drug unusable for all practical purpose. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----